Massachusetts, session 194th, H469.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Price gouging; goods, services and supplies during a Public Health Emergency.
1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meaning:
(a) “Public Health Emergency” shall mean a period of time during which the Governor of
the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or the President of the United States has declared a State of
Emergency pursuant to their respective authorities related to the health and safety of the residents
of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or some portion thereof.
(b) goods, services and supplies shall mean those goods, services, products, and supplies
used, bought or rendered primarily for the care, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
of 3

illness or disease, such term shall include, but not be limited to: bandages, disinfectants, gauze,
or dressings; hand sanitizer, antibiotic ointment, rubbing alcohol, hydrogen peroxide, saline
solution; medical or surgical masks; medical or surgical gloves; tissues; over-the-counter
medication; and any other goods or products identified in emergency regulations promulgated by
the commission of the department of health during a public health emergency.
2. No service provider, manufacturer, supplier, wholesaler, distributor or retail seller of
such goods, services and supplies shall sell or offer for sale any such consumer goods, services
or supplies for an amount which represents an unconscionably excessive price during a Public
Health Emergency.
3. (a) A price is not an “unconscionably excessive price” if it is fifteen percent or less
above the price charged by the seller for such goods, services or supplies immediately prior to
the Public Health Emergency. (b) A defendant may rebut a prima facie case based on an alleged
violation of this section with evidence that additional costs not within the control of the
defendant were imposed on the defendant for the goods, services or supplies that caused the price
to exceed the fifteen percent increase.
4. Where a violation of this section is alleged to have occurred, the Attorney General or
the District Attorney may apply in the name of the people of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts to the Superior Court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts within the judicial
district in which such violations are alleged to have occurred, on notice of five days, for an order
enjoining the allege unlawful acts. In any such proceeding, the court shall impose a civil penalty
in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation plus forfeiture of the
amounts related to any transaction found to be an “unconscionably excessive price”.
of 3

5. This Act shall take effect immediately.
of 3